North Carolina, session 2025, HB679.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of five million four hundred thousand dollars ($5,400,000) in
nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to the Town of Spring
Lake as follows:
(1) Two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) to complete the restoration of the
Historic Spring Lake Civic Center.
(2) One hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) for the Spring Lake Fire
Department.
(3) Five million dollars ($5,000,000) for infrastructure needs.
(4) One hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to assist the Manchester Fire
Department or any other rural fire department that serves the Spring Lake area.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*H679-v-1*